Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1796.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Confidential Insurance Communications Protection Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Survivors of domestic violence and others at risk may face serious threats to their safety and privacy when insurance communications disclose sensitive information to abusers or unintended parties.(2) To protect access to medical and behavioral health services, confidentiality in insurance communications must be guaranteed.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall 123456789101112131415161718 have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Confidential communication." A written, electronic or verbal communication from an insurer, including an explanation of benefits, claims notification, billing statement or appointment reminder."Insurer." An entity authorized to issue health insurance policies or administer health plans in this Commonwealth."Protected individual." A person covered under a health insurance policy who has provided a written request for confidentiality due to fear of endangerment.Section 4. Confidential communication requests.(a) Right of protected individuals.--A protected individual may submit a written request to the insurer for confidential communications. The request must:(1) State that disclosure of health information could endanger the protected individual.(2) Specify the desired alternative communication method, such as:(i) a mailing address different from that of the policyholder;(ii) a secure email address; or(iii) a private telephone number.(b) Duty of insurer.--Not later than 10 business days after receipt of a request under subsection (a), the insurer shall accommodate the request and may not require documentation of abuse beyond the protected individual's attestation.Section 5. Nondisclosure requirement.An insurer may not:(1) Disclose the existence or nature of a confidential 20250HB1796PN2209 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 communication request to the primary policyholder or a third party.(2) Refuse coverage or deny benefits based on a confidentiality request.(3) Require a protected individual to obtain authorization from the policyholder.Section 6. Enforcement.Failure to comply with this act shall constitute a violation of the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act, and may subject the insurer to administrative penalties, including fines and corrective action orders, issued by the Insurance Department.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1796PN2209 - 3 - 1234567891011121314